Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2165.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5289XS (1) 91 sc/ns S.F. 2165 Section 1. Section 1.18, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. The Oxford English dictionary is hereby 3 adopted as the official dictionary of the state of Iowa. 4